Mississippi, session 2026, SB2442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-27-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-1.  (1)  The practice of podiatric medicine is that profession concerned with the prevention, examination, diagnosis and medical, surgical and adjuvant treatment of conditions of the human foot and ankle and their governing and related structures, including the muscles or tendons of the lower leg governing the functions of the foot and ankle and soft tissue up to the tibial tubercle/tuberosity.  For purposes of this section, "ankle" means the ankle joint, which consists of the distal third of the tibia and fibula and their articulations with the talus and the soft tissue structures surrounding the foot and ankle. For the purposes of this chapter, "foot" means that part of the human anatomy which consists of the tarsal bones, metatarsal bones and phalanges. (2)  A podiatrist is a medical care provider who engages in the practice of podiatric medicine. (3)  A licensed podiatrist may prescribe and administer drugs and tests, excluding general and spinal anesthesia, that are essential to the practice of podiatric medicine when used for or in connection with treatment of disorders of the human foot and ankle and their governing and related structures, including the muscles or tendons of the lower leg governing the functions of the foot and ankle and soft tissues up to the tibial tubercle/tuberosity. (4)  A licensed podiatrist may also perform surgical and/or medical treatment of the ankle and governing structures and tissue when the podiatrist has successfully completed a Council of Podiatric Medical Education (CPME) approved three-year postgraduate residency. (5)  A podiatrist properly licensed in Mississippi may perform conservative and surgical treatments of the foot and their governing and related structures, including the muscles or tendons of the lower leg governing the functions of the foot and ankle and soft tissue up to the tibial tubercle/tuberosity, when that podiatrist has completed training determined to be sufficient by the State Board of Medical Licensure at a program accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting association acceptable to the board.  Implementation of the provisions of this subsection (5) shall be made pursuant to rules promulgated by the board that are predicated on the education or level of training, or both, of an applicant. (6)  A licensed podiatrist may perform surgical treatments of the ankle only in an accredited hospital licensed in the state.  Determination of such privileges to perform ankle surgery shall be made by the relevant medical staff of that facility to perform ankle surgery and other delineation of privileges. (7)  For purposes of this section, an accredited hospital is one that is actively licensed in the state by the Department of Health as an acute care hospital with surgical services available. (8)  Nothing in this statute permits a podiatrist to provide treatment at or above the knee. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.